Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1314, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 3129 Page 1


Section 1314. A. The Supreme Court may provide shall establish


guidelines and standards by rule for the following:


1. The acquisition, joint acquisition, maintenance, and


operation of court technology equipment by two or more the Supreme


Court, the Administrative Office of the Courts, district courts, or


court clerks including audio and video recording, broadcasting, and


livestreaming systems required by Section 3 of this act. All


equipment required by Section 3 of this act shall include redundancy


sufficient to prevent loss of recordings;


2. The disposition or transfer of surplus property acquired


from court technology equipment, provided that no rule shall require


or presume reliance solely upon local court funds when equipment is


required to comply with Section 3 of this act; and


3. The guidelines and standards for the use, microfilming and,


digitization, storage, secure preservation, access, retention, and


archiving of court records, including audio and video recordings


that become part of the official court record. Retention shall


conform to the minimum statutory period established in Section 3 of


this act.


B. Court technology equipment necessary to satisfy Section 3 of


this act shall be acquired and funded through legislative


appropriation, statewide contract procurement, or other state-


administered funding mechanisms and shall not be contingent upon the


availability of local court funds.

Req. No. 3129 Page 2


C. The Legislature shall appropriate sufficient funds each


fiscal year to ensure continued implementation, operation,


replacement, and modernization of the audio and video recording,


broadcasting, and livestreaming systems required by Section 3 of


this act. Monies in the Oklahoma Court Information System Revolving


Fund may supplement such funds but shall not be the sole source of


funding for court technology systems. Implementation shall not be


delayed due to a lack of equipment and the Supreme Court and the


Administrative Office of the Courts shall ensure phased statewide


deployment in accordance with Section 3 of this act. Training and


certification programs shall be mandatory for all operators of


courtroom audio and video recording, broadcasting, and livestreaming


systems, transcription providers, and administrative staff.


D. Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall ensure


compatibility with the Oklahoma Court Information System as


described in Section 3 of this act including, but not limited to,


secure digital storage, remote access by authorized transcription


personnel, long-term archival requirements, and centralized public


access archiving in the statewide video portal.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1315, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1315. A. 1. The Supreme Court, by and through the


Office of the Administrative Director Office of the Courts, shall


establish a court information system to be designated the “Oklahoma

Req. No. 3129 Page 3


Court Information System” for the purpose of providing data


processing services to state agencies, boards, and commissions and


other entities pursuant to contract. The Administrative Director


Office of the Courts may assess a reasonable fee for such services.


2. Court clerks and judges of the district courts of this state


shall utilize the case tracking, accounting, legal research, and


other services of the “Oklahoma Oklahoma Court Information System”


System at the direction of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.


The development and implementation of the system’s accounting,


auditing, and financial reporting functions shall be subject to the


approval of the State Auditor and Inspector.


B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving


fund for the Supreme Court to be designated the “Oklahoma Court


Information System Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing


fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of


all monies received in payment of data processing services furnished


pursuant to contract. The Administrative Director of the Courts, at


the end of each month, shall issue a statement of charges to each


entity for which data processing services were furnished. The cost


for data processing services shall be recovered directly from the


entity for which such services were furnished and shall not be


prorated to or payable by those not receiving the services. All


monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated


and may be budgeted and expended by the Supreme Court for:

Req. No. 3129 Page 4


the 1. The acquisition, operation, maintenance, repair, and


replacement of data processing equipment and software;


2. Supplemental support for the acquisition, installation, and


maintenance of courtroom audio and video recording, broadcasting,


and livestreaming systems authorized by subsection C of this


section; and for


the 3. The operational expenses of any court which is subject


to the authority of the Administrative Director Office of the


Courts. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants


issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by


law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services for approval and payment. Until June 30, 2018, the Office


of Management and Enterprise Services shall, at the request of the


Administrative Director of the Courts, transfer an amount not to


exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) from the Oklahoma Court


Information System Revolving Fund to the District Court Interagency


Reimbursement Fund an amount that the


C. The Supreme Court and the Administrative Director Office of


the Courts, with the approval of the Chief Justice of the Supreme


Court, shall deem appropriate and necessary to perform the duties


imposed upon the district courts by law issue requests for proposals


and acquire, install, maintain, and replace audio and video


recording, broadcasting, and livestreaming systems and related



Req. No. 3129 Page 5


software, networking, and data storage services necessary to


implement the provisions of Section 3 of this act.


D. Requests for proposals and purchases issued pursuant to


subsection C of this section shall be processed in accordance with


Section 85.1 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, Section


et seq. and Section 35.1 et seq. of Title 62 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, Section 260:115-1-1 et seq. of the Oklahoma Administrative


Code, and all other applicable state procurement statutes and


administrative rules.


E. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall ensure that


all audio and video recording, broadcasting, and livestreaming


systems acquired under this section support transcription with


sufficient clarity to produce a verbatim written record. The


Supreme Court shall promulgate by rule:


1. Technical specifications for audio and video quality


necessary for accurate transcription;


2. Certification, training, and approval requirements for


transcription providers;


3. Secure processes for verifying transcript accuracy including


access to source recordings; and


4. Standards for electronic storage, archiving, and retrieval


of transcripts and associated recordings.


F. Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt the


Administrative Office of the Courts from coordination with the

Req. No. 3129 Page 6


Office of Management and Enterprise Services for requisition


processing, review of proposals, approval of contracts, or payment


of claims.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1510 of Title 20, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Auto-generated transcript” means a text transcription


created by software that uses speech-to-text or similar


transcription technology from recorded media; and


2. “Recorded media” means any audio, video, or audiovisual


recording of a court proceeding or portion of a court proceeding


created or maintained pursuant to this section or any rule of the


Supreme Court governing court recording.


B. The Supreme Court shall promulgate, by rule or


administrative order, rules governing the use of audio and video


recording, broadcasting, and livestreaming systems in courts of this


state. Such rules shall apply to all courts of record and to all


court proceedings required by law to be open to the public. All


courts of record shall audio- and video-record all public


proceedings. Livestreaming shall be provided for all public


proceedings unless technically infeasible. Such rules shall:





Req. No. 3129 Page 7


1. Permit audio and video recording, broadcasting, and


livestreaming of all open court proceedings, subject to the


limitations of this section;


2. Establish standardized request procedures, advance notice


requirements, placement requirements, and operational restrictions


for audio and video recording, broadcasting, or livestreaming court


proceedings;


3. Establish standardized transcript certification language,


audit procedures, and retention schedules for recorded media;


4. Prohibit the photographing, recording, broadcasting, or


livestreaming of the following individuals to the extent required by


existing Oklahoma Statutes, and not by rule, general judicial


policy, or administrative order:


a. jurors or prospective jurors, as provided in Sections


853 and 853.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. minors whose identity or juvenile records are


confidential pursuant to Section 1-6-107 of Title 10A


of the Oklahoma Statutes,


c. victims or witnesses whose identity or personal


information is confidential or protected pursuant to


Section 142A-9 of Title 21 and Section 60.14 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes,





Req. No. 3129 Page 8


d. vulnerable adults whose records or identifying


information is confidential pursuant to Section 10-110


of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


e. any other individual whose identity is confidential


pursuant to state or federal law. Such state or


federal law shall be cited in the record of the court


proceeding;


5. Preserve the authority of the presiding judge to limit or


suspend audio and video recording, broadcasting, or livestreaming


systems upon specific written findings of fact, supported by clear


and convincing evidence, that such restriction is narrowly tailored


and absolutely necessary to protect a compelling state interest


established under Oklahoma law including, but not limited to, fair


trial rights, witness safety, or statutory confidentiality. A


presiding judge shall not issue a general prohibition on audio and


video recording, broadcasting, or livestreaming of all court


proceedings. Any order restricting audio or video recording,


broadcasting, or livestreaming shall be made on the record and be


subject to accelerated appellate review;


6. Specify retention, secure deletion, sealing, and public


access procedures for recordings that become part of the official


court record. Recordings shall be retained for not less than ten


(10) years or for the duration of all direct appeals, post-



Req. No. 3129 Page 9


conviction proceedings, and federal habeas review, whichever is


longer;


7. Require establishment of a statewide online public access


portal through which recordings of public court proceedings shall be


accessible, subject to statutory confidentiality limitations;


8. Require technological redundancy to prevent the loss of


recordings, including dual-path recording or backup capture


programs;


9. Require compliance with 42 U.S.C., Sections 12101 through


12213, for all recordings, livestreams, and archives, including


closed captioning, interpreter feed integration, and accessibility


features; and


10. Require statewide training and certification standards for


court technology equipment operators, transcription personnel, and


court administrative staff.


C. No broader category of exemption shall be created by rule,


general judicial policy, or administrative order under paragraph 4


of subsection B of this section.


D. Audio or video recordings of court proceedings that become


part of the official court record shall be transcribed by a


certified court reporter or other Supreme Court-authorized


transcription provider upon request of the court, a party, or as


otherwise required by law. The written transcript shall constitute


the official record for purposes of appeal, citation, and other

Req. No. 3129 Page 10


legal proceedings. Audio and video files shall be retained and made


available for reference and verification of the transcript in


accordance with Supreme Court rule. Recordings shall constitute


part of the official court record and shall be made available for


reference and verification.


E. 1. All felony criminal courts shall be fully equipped and


operational no later than January 1, 2026.


2. All civil and family courts shall be fully equipped and


operational no later than January 1, 2027.


3. All other courts including municipal, probate, and specialty


courts shall be fully equipped and operational no later than January


1, 2028.


4. The Supreme Court shall cause an annual progress report to


be published until the full implementation of this subsection is


complete.


F. When a court proceeding or portion of a court proceeding is


recorded pursuant to law or rule, the official court reporter shall:


1. Retrieve and review the recorded media and, if available,


the auto-generated transcript created from that recording;


2. Compare the auto-generated transcript to the recorded media


and make any corrections necessary to ensure that the transcript is


accurate, complete, and verbatim including speaker identifications


where discernible;



Req. No. 3129 Page 11


3. Certify the transcript as an accurate, complete, and


unaltered representation of the recorded portion of the proceeding,


using certification language prescribed by the State Board of


Examiners of Certified Shorthand Reporters;


4. Ensure the transcript includes continuous timestamp


references sufficient to locate corresponding segments of the


recorded media; and


5. Ensure that the transcript includes the entirety of each


subject of testimony or argument and does not contain selective


portions that materially alter context or meaning.


G. The court reporter shall immediately report to the presiding


judge and to the Administrative Office of the Courts any gap,


interruption, omission, or corruption in the recorded media, missing


timeframe in the recorded media, or incomplete segment preventing


complete transcript certification. The report required by this


subsection shall be in writing, filed under the case number, and


preserved as part of the official court record.


H. No person including any court reporter, court clerk,


attorney, judge, vendor, contractor, or agent of the state shall


knowingly and willfully alter, delete, conceal, obscure, corrupt, or


fail to report a gap in recorded media with the intent to impair,


influence, or affect the integrity or accuracy of the official court


record.



Req. No. 3129 Page 12


I. Any person who engages in conduct prohibited by this


subsection shall be subject to the penalties under Section 1513 of


Title 20 of the Oklahoma Statutes and prosecution under state law


including, but not limited to, those prohibiting tampering with


evidence.


J. When recorded media is offered or admitted as evidence, the


court reporter shall ensure that a certified transcript accompanies


the recording; the transcript includes notation of objections, bench


conferences, sealed or confidential portions, and redactions


required by law; and the recording is marked and secured in a format


compatible with the Oklahoma Court Information System and any


applicable rules of appellate procedure. If a redacted version is


used for public access, the unredacted original shall be preserved


under seal as part of the record.


K. No court employee, contractor, or agent shall be


disciplined, terminated, retaliated against, or otherwise penalized


for reporting suspected tampering, corruption, suppression, or


mismanagement of court recordings.


SECTION 4. REPEALER 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1512, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3129 BLB 1/14/2026 8:57:32 AM



Req. No. 3129 Page 13